Washington statutes.
RCW 16.65.005

Purpose.

The purpose of this chapter is to ensure the orderly marketing of livestock, to ensure the financial stability of public livestock markets, and to protect persons who consign livestock to markets and sales.

[ 2003 c 326 s 61.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2003 c 326: See RCW 16.57.902.